Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1314
Property paid or delivered to State Treasurer; owner not entitled to income.

When property is paid or delivered to the State Treasurer under sections 69-1301 to 69-1329, the owner is not entitled to receive income or other increments accruing thereafter.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 14, p. 2487.